Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2336YH (1) 91 cm/ns H.F. 321 Section 1. Section 602.6404, subsection 3, Code 2025, 1 is amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 3. A person is not required to be an attorney licensed to 4 practice law in this state as a condition of being appointed to 5 the office of magistrate, but a county magistrate appointing 6 commission shall first consider applicants who are admitted 7 to practice law in this state when selecting persons for the 8 office of magistrate. 9